Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act
Chancery court had the authority to order a congregational church to compile a list of qualified voters and hold an election to decide whether to retain its pastor, as the church’s bylaws did not provide a means for resolving the dispute; and the court merely established a procedure for voting and did not decide an ecclesiastical issue. Pilgrim Rest Missionary Baptist Church v. Wallace, 835 So. 2d 67, 2003 Miss. LEXIS 28 (Miss. 2003).

§79-11-133.
Notice to Attorney General of commencement of certain proceedings.

The Attorney General shall be given notice of the commencement of any proceeding which Section 79-11-101 et seq. authorize the Attorney General to bring but which has been commenced by another person.

Whenever any provision of Section 79-11-101 et seq. requires that notice be given to the Attorney General or permits the Attorney General to commence a proceeding:

If no proceeding has been commenced, the Attorney General may take appropriate action including, but not limited to, seeking injunctive relief.

If a proceeding has been commenced by a person other than the Attorney General, the Attorney General, as of right, may intervene in such proceeding.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 17, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, typographical errors in subsections (1) and (2) were corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The corrections were ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Attorney General generally, see §§ 7-5-1 et seq.

Application to religious corporations, see § 79-11-403.

§79-11-135.
Persons who may act as incorporators.

One or more persons may act as the incorporator or incorporators of a corporation by delivering articles of incorporation to the Secretary of State for filing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 18, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Incorporators under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-2.01.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 91.

§79-11-137.
Contents of articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation must set forth:

A corporate name for the corporation that satisfies the requirements of Section 79-11-157;

The period of duration, which may be perpetual;

The information required by Section 79-35-5(a);

The name and address of each incorporator;

If the corporation is incorporated on or after January 1, 2012, the corporation’s initial planned, primary nonprofit activity; and

Any other information the Secretary of State may reasonably require by rule, including, without limitation, the contact name, electronic mail address, telephone number or business or mailing address of the corporation or that can be used to contact the corporation.

The articles of incorporation may set forth:

The names and addresses of the individuals who are to serve as the initial directors;

Provisions not inconsistent with law regarding:

The purpose or purposes for which the corporation is organized;

Managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation;

Defining, limiting and regulating the powers of the corporation, its board of directors and members;

Any provision that under Section 79-11-101 et seq. is required or permitted to be set forth in the bylaws; and

A provision permitting or making obligatory indemnification of a director for liability (as defined in Section 79-11-281(1)(c)) to any person for any action taken, or any failure to take any action as a director, except liability for:

Receipt of a financial benefit to which the director is not entitled;

An intentional infliction of harm;

A violation of Section 79-11-270; or

An intentional violation of criminal law.

The articles of incorporation need not set forth any of the corporate powers enumerated in Section 79-11-101 et seq.

The liability of a director of a corporation that is not a charitable organization as defined in Section 79-11-501 may be eliminated or limited by a provision of the articles of incorporation that a director shall not be liable to the corporation or its members for money damages for any action taken or any failure to take any action as a director, except liability for:

The amount of a financial benefit received by the director to which the director is not entitled;

An intentional infliction of harm;

A violation of Section 79-11-270; or

An intentional violation of criminal law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 19; Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 4; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 56, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

In 2009, typographical errors in subsections (2)(c) and (3) were corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The corrections were ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

The 2011 amendment, effective January 1, 2012, added (1)(e) and (f); added (2)(d); added (4); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (1)(c), which formerly read: “The street address of the corporation’s initial registered office and the name of its initial registered office and the name of its initial registered agent at that office.”

Articles of incorporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-2.02.

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.

Purposes for which nonprofit corporation may be organized, see § 79-11-149.

General powers of corporation, see § 79-11-151.

Restrictions on corporate names, see § 79-11-157.

Articles of incorporation may provide for electronic annual or regular meetings, see § 79-11-197.

Articles of incorporation may provide for electronic special meetings, see § 79-11-199.

Amendments to articles of incorporation, see §§ 79-11-295 through 79-11-311.

Applicability of this section to amendment of articles of incorporation to carry out plan of court ordered reorganization, see § 79-11-309.

Obtaining articles of incorporation through fraud as grounds for judicial dissolution, see § 79-11-355.

A landowner who willfully purchases property subject to control of residential property owners association and derives benefits from membership implies his consent to be charged assessment and dues common to all other members, and the provisions of Mississippi Code § 79-11-1(2)(g), requiring non-profit corporations to make expulsion the only remedy for non-payment of dues, were not controlling. Perry v. Bridgetown Community Asso., 486 So. 2d 1230, 1986 Miss. LEXIS 2889 (Miss. 1986).

It is the duty of state officials to act without unreasonable delays on applications either for charter amendments or for new charters, and if such action is unduly delayed or arbitrarily or discriminatorily made, the doors may be opened to federal jurisdiction. Williams v. Tri-County Community Center, 323 F. Supp. 286, 1971 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14935 (S.D. Miss.), aff'd, 452 F.2d 221, 1971 U.S. App. LEXIS 6768 (5th Cir. Miss. 1971).

Where quo warranto proceedings were brought seeking forfeiture of a nonprofit corporation’s franchises and privileges on the ground that such corporation, which operated programs providing services for poor people in certain counties in Mississippi, and which had received a federal grant for a health care delivery program, had exceeded its corporate powers, and such proceedings were removed to federal court, allegations of the corporation that state officials had refused to act on proposed amendments to its charter that set forth the powers of the corporation to operate a health services program and on an application of the health center for a charter as a nonprofit, nonstock corporation, did not preclude remand of the case, but if the state court should fail to give relief on this issue and if the action by state officials should be unduly delayed or arbitrarily or discriminatorily named, the doors would then be open to federal jurisdiction. Williams v. Tri-County Community Center, 323 F. Supp. 286, 1971 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14935 (S.D. Miss.), aff'd, 452 F.2d 221, 1971 U.S. App. LEXIS 6768 (5th Cir. Miss. 1971).

Code 1942, § 5310.1, as formerly enacted, which gave to the governor unlimited discretion to deny a charter to a non-profit corporation was unconstitutional for the reason that it conferred an absolute and arbitrary discretion in a state official to grant or deny a right or privilege. Smith v. Ladner, 288 F. Supp. 66, 1968 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9386 (S.D. Miss. 1968).

This section [Code 1942, § 5310.1] has no application to foreign corporations seeking domestication in Mississippi, but applies only to persons seeking an original state charter. NAACP v. Thompson, 357 F.2d 831, 1966 U.S. App. LEXIS 6953 (5th Cir. Miss.), cert. denied, 385 U.S. 820, 87 S. Ct. 45, 17 L. Ed. 2d 58, 1966 U.S. LEXIS 643 (U.S. 1966).

A nonprofit corporation may provide either in the articles of incorporation or its bylaws the method for appointment or election of directors, which may include some manner of appointment by specified individuals. Williamson, Feb. 4, 2000, A.G. Op. #99-0674.

15 Am. Jur. 2d, Charities §§ 163,
169 and
170,
171.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 37.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 166,
174.

4 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Charities §§ 55:144, 55:145.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:824 et seq.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 91.

§79-11-139.
When corporate existence begins; filing of articles of incorporation as conclusive proof that conditions of incorporation satisfied.

Unless a delayed effective date is specified, the corporate existence begins when the articles of incorporation are filed.

The Secretary of State’s filing of the articles of incorporation is conclusive proof that the incorporators satisfied all conditions precedent to incorporation except in a proceeding by the state to cancel or revoke the incorporation or involuntarily dissolve the corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 20, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Incorporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-2.03.

Creditor who participated in bankruptcy proceedings in which debtor petitioned as corporation held precluded from suing incorporators as partners. Natalbany Lumber Co. v. Countiss, 134 Miss. 511, 99 So. 262, 1924 Miss. LEXIS 294 (Miss. 1924).

The requirement of this section [Code 1942, § 5320] as to report of organization may be dispensed with by law passed after corporation has failed to comply with its provisions. Southern Coal Co. v. Yazoo Ice & Coal Co., 118 Miss. 860, 80 So. 334, 1918 Miss. LEXIS 140 (Miss. 1918).

Law authorizing corporation to file report of organization after time limited by this section [Code 1942, § 5320] held not to violate Const. § 180. Southern Coal Co. v. Yazoo Ice & Coal Co., 118 Miss. 860, 80 So. 334, 1918 Miss. LEXIS 140 (Miss. 1918).

Stockholders including one purchasing stock in the corporation after it had lost its right to do business for failure to report organization held to have done business under the charter within this section [Code 1942, § 5320]. Hessig-Ellis Drug Co. v. Wilkerson, 115 Miss. 668, 76 So. 570, 1917 Miss. LEXIS 248 (Miss. 1917).

Incorporators must see that their report is received as required by statute. Ragland v. Doolittle, 100 Miss. 498, 56 So. 445, 1911 Miss. LEXIS 35 (Miss. 1911).

Corporation held liable where only report of incorporators shows on its face that it had been organized and doing business several months before the report was made. Ragland v. Doolittle, 100 Miss. 498, 56 So. 445, 1911 Miss. LEXIS 35 (Miss. 1911).

Creditors doing business with void corporation held not estopped from setting up liability of incorporators as partners. Ragland v. Doolittle, 100 Miss. 498, 56 So. 445, 1911 Miss. LEXIS 35 (Miss. 1911).

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 182- 183.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 91.

§79-11-141.
Liability for purporting to act for corporation where incorporation has not occurred.

All persons purporting to act as or on behalf of a corporation, knowing there was no incorporation under Section 79-11-101 et seq., are jointly and severally liable for all liabilities created while so acting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 21, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in the section was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Liability for purporting to act for corporation prior to incorporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-2.04.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 91.

§79-11-143.
Organizational meeting after incorporation; written consents in lieu of organizational meeting.

After incorporation:

If initial directors are named in the articles of incorporation, the initial directors shall hold an organizational meeting, at the call of a majority of the directors, to complete the organization of the corporation by appointing officers, adopting bylaws and carrying on any other business brought before the meeting;

If initial directors are not named in the articles, the incorporator or incorporators shall hold an organizational meeting at the call of a majority of the incorporators:

To elect directors and complete the organization of the corporation; or

To elect a board of directors who shall complete the organization of the corporation.

Action required or permitted by Section 79-11-101 et seq. to be taken by incorporators at an organizational meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action taken is evidenced by one or more written consents describing the action taken and signed by each incorporator.

An organizational meeting may be held in or out of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 22, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in subsection (2) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Organizational meeting after incorporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-2.05.

Amendments to corporate bylaws, see §§ 79-11-313 through 79-11-317.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 575, 615, 774, 781.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1025, 74:1042-74:1045.

§79-11-145.
Bylaws.

The incorporators or board of directors of a corporation shall adopt bylaws for the corporation.

The bylaws may contain any provision for regulating and managing the affairs of the corporation that is not inconsistent with law or the articles of incorporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 23, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Bylaws under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-2.06.

2A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Associations and Clubs §§ 27:46, 27:52 et seq.

§79-11-147.
Emergency bylaws; emergency defined.

Unless the articles provide otherwise, the directors of a corporation may adopt bylaws to be effective only in an emergency defined in subsection (4) of this section. The emergency bylaws, which are subject to amendment or repeal by the members, may provide special procedures necessary for managing the corporation during the emergency, including:

How to call a meeting of the board;

Quorum requirements for the meeting; and

Designation of additional or substitute directors.

All provisions of the regular bylaws consistent with the emergency bylaws remain effective during the emergency. The emergency bylaws are not effective after the emergency ends.

Corporate action taken in good faith in accordance with the emergency bylaws:

Binds the corporation; and

May not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee or agent.

An emergency exists for purposes of this section if a quorum of the corporation’s directors cannot readily be assembled because of some catastrophic event.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 24, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Emergency bylaws under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-2.07.

§79-11-149.
Activities for which corporations may be organized.

Corporations may be organized under Section 79-11-101 et seq. for any lawful activity. A corporation engaging in an activity that is subject to regulation under another statute of this state may incorporate under Section 79-11-101 et seq. only if permitted by, and subject to all limitations of, the other statute.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 25, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in the section was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Purposes for which corporations may be organized under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-3.01.

Restrictions on corporate names, see § 79-11-157.

Nonprofit purposes and character which warrant creation of nonprofit corporation. 16 A.L.R.2d 1345.

15 Am. Jur. 2d, Charities §§ 173, 174.

14 C.J.S., Charities §§ 72, 73.

§79-11-151.
Powers of corporation.

Each corporation shall have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect any or all of the purposes for which the corporation is organized including, without limitation, power:

To have perpetual succession by its corporate name unless a limited period of duration is stated in its articles of incorporation.

To sue and be sued, complain and defend, in its corporate name.

To have a corporate seal which may be altered at will, and to use the same by causing it, or a facsimile thereof, to be impressed or affixed or in any other manner reproduced.

To purchase, take, receive, lease, take by gift, devise or bequest, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, use and otherwise deal in and with real or personal property, or any interest therein, wherever situated.

To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, transfer and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property and assets.

To lend money to its employees other than its officers and directors and otherwise assist its employees, officers and directors.

To purchase, take, receive, subscribe for or otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, use, employ, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge or otherwise dispose of, and otherwise use and deal in and with, shares or other interests in, or obligations of, other domestic or foreign corporations, whether business or nonprofit, associations, partnerships or individuals, or direct or indirect obligations of the United States, or of any other government, state, territory, governmental district or municipality or of any instrumentality thereof.

To make contracts and guarantees, incur liabilities, borrow money at such rates of interest as the corporation may determine, issue its notes, bonds and other obligations and secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of all or any of its property, franchises and income, and make contracts of guaranty and suretyship.

To lend money for its corporate purposes, invest and reinvest its funds and take and hold real and personal property as security for the payment of funds so lent or invested.

To conduct its affairs, carry on its operations and have offices and exercise the powers granted by Section 79-11-101 et seq. in any state, territory, district or possession of the United States or in any foreign country.

To elect or appoint officers and agents of the corporation, who may be directors or members, and define their duties and fix their compensation.

To make and alter bylaws, not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation or with the laws of this state, for the administration and regulation of the affairs of the corporation.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, to make donations for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific or educational purposes.

To pay pensions and establish pension plans or pension trusts for any or all of its directors, officers and employees.

To cease its corporate activities and surrender its corporate franchise.

To impose dues, assessments, admission and transfer fees upon its members.

To establish conditions for admission to membership, admit members and issue memberships.

To carry on a business.

To do all things necessary or convenient, not inconsistent with law, to further the activities and affairs of the corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 26; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 54, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

Power of water, sewer, garbage disposal, or fire protection districts to buy, lease or otherwise acquire assets and facilities of nonprofit corporation organized pursuant to the Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act (§§ 79-11-101 et seq.), see § 19-5-181.

General powers of corporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-3.02.

Lack of necessity of setting forth the powers enumerated in this section in the articles of incorporation, see § 79-11-137.

Liability of director for unlawful distribution, see § 79-11-270.

Effect of merger on the title to real estate and other property, see § 79-11-325.

Effect of dissolution on the title to corporation’s property, see § 79-11-341.

Nonprofit charitable institutions as within operation of labor statutes. 26 A.L.R.2d 1020.

Power of a business corporation to donate to a charitable or similar institution. 39 A.L.R.2d 1192.

Distribution of funds by nonprofit corporation absent dissolution. 51 A.L.R.3d 1318.

Liability of charitable organization under respondeat superior doctrine for tort of unpaid volunteer. 82 A.L.R.3d 1213.

15 Am. Jur. 2d, Charities §§ 173, 176.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 1718.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 2397.

14 C.J.S., Charities §§ 72, 73.

Note, Developments in the law: nonprofit corporations. 105 Harv L. Rev. 1579.

§79-11-153.
Emergency powers of board of directors; notice during emergency; officers may be deemed directors during emergency; effect of emergency corporate action; emergency defined.

In anticipation of or during an emergency defined in subsection (4) of this section, the board of directors of a corporation may:

Modify lines of succession to accommodate the incapacity of any director, officer, employee or agent; and

Relocate the principal office, designate alternative principal offices or regional offices, or authorize the officer to do so.

During an emergency defined in subsection (4) of this section, unless emergency bylaws provide otherwise:

Notice of a meeting of the board of directors need be given only to those directors whom it is practicable to reach and may be given in any practicable manner, including by publication and radio; and

One or more officers of the corporation present at a meeting of the board of directors may be deemed to be directors for the meeting, in order of rank and within the same rank in order of seniority, as necessary to achieve a quorum.

Corporate action taken in good faith during an emergency under this section to further the ordinary affairs of the corporation:

Binds the corporation; and

May not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee or agent.

An emergency exists for purposes of this section if a quorum of the corporation’s directors cannot readily be assembled because of some catastrophic event.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 27, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Liability of director for unlawful distribution, see § 79-11-270.

§79-11-155.
Challenge to corporation’s power to act.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the validity of corporate action may not be challenged on the ground that the corporation lacks or lacked power to act.

A corporation’s power to act may be challenged in a proceeding against the corporation to enjoin an act where a third party has not acquired rights. The proceeding may be brought by the Attorney General, a director or by a member or members in a derivative proceeding.

A corporation’s power to act may be challenged in a proceeding against an incumbent or former director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation. The proceeding may be brought by a director, the corporation, directly, derivatively, or through a receiver or by a trustee or other legal representative.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 28, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Attorney General generally, see §§ 7-5-1 et seq.

Challenge to corporation’s power to act under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-3.04.

Citizens who intervened after a city’s case against a non-profit corporation for negligent entrustment of trust properties was dismissed also lacked standing to pursue the claims regarding the corporation’s sale of a hospital to a for-profit corporation because under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-11-155, the citizens were not corporate members under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-11-127, nor was the action pursued in name of the State. City of Picayune v. Southern Reg'l Corp., 916 So. 2d 510, 2005 Miss. LEXIS 810 (Miss. 2005).

§79-11-157.
Corporate name.

A corporate name may not contain language stating or implying that the corporation is organized for a purpose other than that permitted by Section 79-11-149 and its articles of incorporation.

Except as authorized by subsections (3) and (4), a corporate name must be distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from:

The corporate name of a nonprofit or business corporation incorporated or authorized to do business in this state;

A corporate name reserved or registered under Sections 79-11-159, 79-11-161, 79-4-4.02 or 79-4-4.03; or

The fictitious name of a foreign business or nonprofit corporation authorized to transact business in this state because its real name is unavailable.

A corporation may apply to the Secretary of State for authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable upon the Secretary of State’s records from one or more of the names described in subsection (2). The Secretary of State shall authorize use of the name applied for if:

The other corporation consents to the use in writing and submits an undertaking in form satisfactory to the Secretary of State to change its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from the name of the applying corporation; or

The applicant delivers to the Secretary of State a certified copy of a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant’s right to use the name applied for in this state.

A corporation may use the name, including the fictitious name, of another domestic or foreign business or nonprofit corporation that is used in this state if the other corporation is incorporated or authorized to do business in this state and the proposed user corporation:

Has merged with the other corporation;

Has been formed by reorganization of the other corporation; or

Has acquired all or substantially all of the assets, including the corporate name, of the other corporation.

Section 79-11-101 et seq. do not control the use of fictitious names.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 29; Laws, 1988, ch. 417, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in subsection (2) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting ‘ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for ‘ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Section 79-4-4.03, referred to in (2)(b), was repealed by
Laws of 2014, ch. 468, § 9, effective July 1, 2014.

Corporate name under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-4.01.

Applicability of this section to the information which must be set forth in the articles of incorporation, see § 79-11-137.

Amendment changing corporation’s name does not abate proceedings brought by or against the corporation in its former name, see § 79-11-311.

Applicability of this section to corporation’s application for reinstatement after administrative dissolution, see § 79-11-351.

Effect of name of foreign corporation not satisfying requirements of this section, see § 79-11-373.

This provision does not apply in the case of cooperative associations. Staple Cotton Cooperative Asso. v. Federal Staple Cotton Co-op Asso., 249 Miss. 465, 162 So. 2d 867, 1964 Miss. LEXIS 407 (Miss. 1964).

Right of benevolent or fraternal society or organization to protection against use of same or similar name, insignia, or ritual by another organization.
76 A.L.R.2d 1396.

Right to protection of corporate name, as between domestic corporation and foreign corporation not qualified to do business in state.
26 A.L.R.3d 994.

Right of charitable or religious association or corporation to protection against use of same or similar name by another.
37 A.L.R.3d 277.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 240,
241,
244.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 1-14.

Walker, Common law protection of economic expectancies: “Business Torts” in Mississippi.
50 Miss. L. J. 335, March, 1979.

§79-11-159.
Reserving exclusive use of corporate name; transferring reserved corporate name.

A person may reserve the exclusive use of a legal corporate name that complies with Section 79-11-157, including a fictitious name for a foreign corporation whose corporate name is not available, by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing. Upon finding that the corporate name applied for is available, the Secretary of State shall reserve the name for the applicant’s exclusive use for a period of one hundred eighty (180) days. The one-hundred-eighty-day period may be renewed once by the applicant by filing a renewal application within thirty (30) days before the expiration of the initial one-hundred-eighty-day period.

The owner of a reserved corporate name may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the Secretary of State a signed notice of the transfer that states the name and address of the transferee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 30; Laws, 2014, ch. 468, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment, in (1), inserted “legal” following “the exclusive use of a” and “that complies with Section 79-11-157” following “corporate name” in the first sentence; deleted “nonrenewable” following “applicant’s exclusive use for” near the end of the second sentence; added the last sentence; and in (2), inserted “to” following “another person by delivering.”

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Reserving exclusive use of corporate name under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-4.02.

Filing Fees, see § 79-11-109.

Restrictions on corporate names, see § 79-11-157.

Applicability of this section to requirements for corporate name of foreign corporation, see § 79-11-373.

Right of benevolent or fraternal society or organization to protection against use of same or similar name, insignia, or ritual by another organization.
76 A.L.R.2d 1396.

Right to protection of corporate name, as between domestic corporation and foreign corporation not qualified to do business in state.
26 A.L.R.3d 994.

Right of charitable or religious association or corporation to protection against use of same or similar name by another.
37 A.L.R.3d 277.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 240,
241,
244.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 1-14.

Walker, Common law protection of economic expectancies: “Business Torts” in Mississippi.
50 Miss. L. J. 335, March, 1979.

§79-11-161.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2014, ch. 468, § 10, effective from and after July 1, 2014.

§79-11-161. [Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 31, eff from and after January 1, 1988.]

Former
§ 79-11-161 provided for the registration of a foreign corporation’s corporate name.

§79-11-163.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 130, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-11-163. [Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 32; Laws, 1988, ch. 417, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1988.]

Former
§ 79-11-163 pertained to the requirement that corporation maintain registered office and registered agent within state. For present provisions relating to registered agents, see
§§ 79-35-1 et seq.

§79-11-165.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 131, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-11-165. [Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 33; Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 5, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2012.]

Former
§ 79-11-165 pertained to change of registered office or registered agent of nonprofit corporation. For present provisions relating to registered agents, see
§§ 79-35-1 et seq.

§79-11-167.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 132, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-11-167. [Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 34, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1988.]

Former
§ 79-11-167 pertained to the resignation of registered agent of nonprofit corporation. For present similar see
§ 79-35-11.

§79-11-169.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 133, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-11-169. [Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 35, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1988.]

Former
§ 79-11-169 pertained to registered agent as agent for service of process, notice, or demand. For present provisions relating to registered agents, see
§§ 79-35-1 et seq.

§79-11-171.
Admission of person as member of corporation.

A corporation may admit any person as a member. The articles or bylaws may establish criteria or procedures for admission.

No person shall be admitted as a member without his or her consent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 36, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

A community hospital may act as the sole member of a Mississippi nonprofit corporation engaged in the delivery of health care services, including ambulatory surgery services, to the citizens of its service area.
Williamson, May 22, 1998, A.G. Op. #98-0269.

Suspension or expulsion from professional association and the remedies therefor. 20 A.L.R.2d 531.

Right to damages for exclusion from membership in social or fraternal organization. 59 A.L.R.2d 1290.

Compelling admission to membership in professional association or society. 89 A.L.R.2d 964.

Exclusion or expulsion from association or club as violation of state civil rights act. 38 A.L.R.4th 628.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1042-74:1045.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 91.

§79-11-173.
Consideration for admission of members to corporation.

Except as provided in its articles or bylaws, a corporation may admit members for no consideration or for such consideration as is determined by the board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 37, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 91.

§79-11-175.
Corporation not required to have members.

A corporation is not required to have members.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 38, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

A community hospital may act as the sole member of a Mississippi nonprofit corporation engaged in the delivery of health care services, including ambulatory surgery services, to the citizens of its service area.
Williamson, May 22, 1998, A.G. Op. #98-0269.

For purposes of creating a nonprofit corporation, a county is an “entity” within the meaning of § 79-11-127(o),
and is therefore a “person” within the meaning of § 79-11-127(y); thus, a county qualifies as a “member” pursuant to § 79-11-127(v) and may serve as a member of a nonprofit corporation as permitted by § 79-11-175.
Griffith, July 23, 1999, A.G. Op. #99-0370.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 91.

§79-11-177.
Rights and obligations of members.

All members shall have the same rights and obligations with respect to voting, dissolution, redemption and transfer, unless the articles or bylaws establish classes of membership with different rights or obligations. All members shall have the same rights and obligations with respect to any other matters, except as set forth in or authorized by the articles or bylaws.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 39, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

The assessment of security fees against owners of improved lots in an association did not violate the statute since owners of improved lots were more likely to use and need the benefits of security than owners of unimproved parcels of land and the distinction did not affect the other rights or obligations of the members in any way. Longanecker v. Diamondhead Country Club, 760 So. 2d 764, 2000 Miss. LEXIS 148 (Miss. 2000).

14 C.J.S., Charities § 91.

§79-11-179.
Transfer of membership or right arising therefrom.

Except as set forth or authorized by the articles or bylaws, no member of a corporation may transfer a membership or any right arising therefrom.

Where transfer rights have been provided, no restriction on them shall be binding with respect to a member holding a membership issued prior to the adoption of the restriction unless the restriction is approved by the members and the affected member.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 40, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

§79-11-181.
Liability of members for acts, debts, liabilities, or obligations of corporation.

A member of a corporation is not, as such, personally liable for the acts, debts, liabilities, or obligations of the corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 41, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 50.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Form 43.1 (complaint, petition, or declaration – to collect on corporate debt-corporation the alter ego of individual).

14 C.J.S., Charities §§ 73-75.

§79-11-183.
Liability of members for dues, assessments or fees.

A member may become liable to the corporation for dues, assessments or fees; provided, however, that an article or bylaw provision or a resolution adopted by the board authorizing or imposing dues, assessments or fees does not, of itself, create liability.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 42, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

§79-11-185.
Actions by creditors to reach liability of member to corporation.

No proceeding may be brought by a creditor to reach the liability, if any, of a member to the corporation unless final judgment has been rendered in favor of the creditor against the corporation and execution has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part or unless such proceeding would be useless.

All creditors of the corporation, with or without reducing their claims to judgment, may intervene in any creditor’s proceeding brought under subsection (1) of this section to reach and apply unpaid amounts due the corporation. Any or all members who owe amounts to the corporation may be joined in such proceeding.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 43, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 50.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Form 43.1 (complaint, petition, or declaration – to collect on corporate debt-corporation the alter ego of individual).

§79-11-187.
Resignation of member.

A member may resign at any time.

The resignation of a member does not relieve the member from any obligations the member may have to the corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 44, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 776.